New York, session 2025-2026, S4953.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The mental hygiene law is amended by adding a new section 2 19.18-d to read as follows: 3 § 19.18-d Intensive addiction and medical services integrated services 4 pilot program. 5 1. Within the funds appropriated to the office, a pilot program shall 6 be established to support two three-year demonstration programs that 7 provide intensive addiction and medical services integrated services to 8 individuals who have significant addiction and medical issues. One of 9 the demonstration programs shall be located in a rural area and one 10 shall be located in an urban setting as determined by the commissioner. 11 The services provided shall include but not be limited to intensive 12 physical health care services, addiction counseling for both the indi- 13 vidual with significant addiction and medical issues and their family, 14 peer supports, and transportation assistance. Such services shall be 15 primarily provided in a treatment facility certified by the office or, 16 as clinically and socially necessitated, in the community or home of the 17 individual receiving such services. Such funding may also be used to 18 build a new facility or modify an existing facility for the purposes of 19 such demonstration programs. 20 2. Not later than June thirtieth of the year following the enactment 21 of this section, and annually thereafter, the commissioner shall provide 22 the governor, the temporary president of the senate, the minority leader EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03993-01-5 S. 4953 2 1 of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, the minority leader of the 2 assembly, the chair of the senate standing committee on alcoholism and 3 substance abuse, and the chair of the assembly committee on alcoholism 4 and drug abuse with a written evaluation of the demonstration programs 5 established pursuant to subdivision one of this section. Such evaluation 6 shall, at a minimum, address the overall effectiveness of such demon- 7 stration programs, identify best practices for services provided under 8 the demonstration programs and any additional services that may be 9 appropriate within each type of program operated, regulated, funded, or 10 approved by the office, address whether continuation or expansion of the 11 pilot program established by subdivision one of this section is recom- 12 mended, and identify any changes needed in existing medicaid or private 13 insurance reimbursement models. The written evaluation shall be made 14 publicly available on the office's website. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of April next succeeding 16 the fiscal year in which this act shall have become a law and shall 17 expire March 31 of the third succeeding fiscal year thereafter when upon 18 such date the provisions of this act shall be deemed repealed. Effec- 19 tive immediately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or 20 regulation necessary for the implementation of this act on or before its 21 effective date are authorized to be made and completed on or before such 22 effective date.